Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2915
District; dissolution; procedure.

Any district subject to the provisions of sections 23-2904 to 23-2915 which has no outstanding indebtedness may be dissolved in the manner provided for formation of such districts. When such dissolution is ordered, any remaining funds of the district shall be transferred to the counties in which the district is situated in the same proportion as the area of the district in each county bears to the total area of the district, and such funds shall be deposited in the general fund of the respective counties.

Laws 1977, LB 29, § 15.